Utah statutes.
76-10-1226.   Exemptions from application of film distribution act.
This part does not apply to any film:
(1)  distributed to or exhibited by any accredited university, college,
school, library, or other educational institution, church, or museum, if there
is scientific, religious, or educational justification for the exhibition of
the film; or
(2)  exhibited by the Department of Corrections or exhibited as part of any
treatment program operated by or under contract with the department if the
exhibition of the film is solely for the assessment or treatment of an
offender as defined under Section 64-13-1.
